Massachusetts, session 194th, S416.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 91 of said chapter 71, as appearing in the 2018 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by adding the following subsection:- (f) For the purposes of transportation
reimbursements only, a recovery high school shall be considered a regional school, subject to
appropriation.
of 1